Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3

Museum Donation Act

4-12-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Museum Donation Act.”

Acts 1983, ch. 420, § 1.

Cross-References. Abandoned cultural property, title 66, ch. 29, part 2.

4-12-302. Tennessee state museum — Defined.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires, “Tennessee state museum” means the facility operated as the military branch of the Tennessee state museum in the War Memorial Building, the facility located in the James K. Polk Building, and the Bill Haslam Center located at 1000 Rosa L. Parks Boulevard.

Acts 1983, ch. 420. § 3; 2018, ch. 821, § 14; 2020, ch. 800, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning Governor Haslam, see Acts 2020, ch. 800.

4-12-303. Powers of executive director.

It is the intention and purpose of the general assembly that the museum executive director be empowered to accept donations of funds and objects for the benefit of the Tennessee state museum.

Acts 1983, ch. 420, § 2; 2018, ch. 821, § 15.

Cross-References. Additional duties of museum director concerning gifts and contributions, §4-12-102.